Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3058.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 25B of chapter 54 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking, in lines 185 through 191, the second paragraph of paragraph (13)
of subsection (a) and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:–
(4) shall be received by the city or town clerk before the hour fixed for closing the polls
on the day of a preliminary or primary; provided, however, that an early voting ballot mailed on
or before the day of a biennial state election or any other state election shall be accepted until 5
p.m. on the third day after the election and shall be processed in accordance with section 95. A
postmark, if legible, shall be evidence of the time of mailing.
of 1